District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.67

Repealed

Merger or consolidation — Vote required for approval by shareholders.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 207, ch. 267, § 67
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(w), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.67.
1981 Ed., § 29-367.
1973 Ed., § 29-927c.